Mississippi, session 2026, HB4177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Stephen R. Sims of Forrest County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Embezzlement x6 in Newton County, on January 18, 2011, for which he was sentenced to serve five (5) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections, with each count to run concurrently.  He was paroled on June 29, 2012, and returned from parole on November 19, 2012.  His order was amended on October 17, 2012, in Newton County Circuit Court to serve ten (10) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was continued on parole June 18, 2013, and discharged on February 13, 2017.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.